src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v3_lua_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo: Proofread the gold standard (below), then run analyser, then correct. 
# lua, syä, käyä 


  Verb - lua - paradigmgroup v3: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     lua+V+Inf: [lua, luoa, luoja]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [luon]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [luot]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [luo, luopi, luopii]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [luoma]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [luotta]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [luo, luova, luohaan, luothaan]
     lua+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [luohaan, luothaan]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [luo]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [loin]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [loit]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [loi]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [loima]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [loitta]
     lua+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [loit, luothiin]
     lua+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [luothiin]
     lua+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [luo]
     lua+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [luoko]
     lua+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [luo]
     lua+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [luokaa]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [loisin]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [loisit]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [lois]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [loisima]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [loisitta]
     lua+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [loisit, loisiva]
     lua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [luova]
     lua+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [luovat]
     lua+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [luotava]
     lua+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [luotavat]
     lua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [luonu]
     lua+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [luohneet, luonheet]
     lua+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [luotu]
     lua+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [luotut]
     lua+V+AgPrc: [luoma]
     lua+V+Pass+Cond: [lois]
     lua+V+InfE+Ine: [luessa, luoessa]
     lua+V+InfE+Ins: [luoen]
     lua+V+InfMa+Ill: [luomhaan, luohmaan]
     lua+V+InfMa+Ine: [luomassa]
     lua+V+InfMa+Ela: [luomasta]
     lua+V+InfMa+Ade: [luomala]
     lua+V+InfMa+Abe: [luomatta]
     lua+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [luominen]


#Verb - syä - v4_4lla: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     syä+V+Inf: syä
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [syön]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [syöt]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [syö, syöpi, syöpii]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [syömä]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [syöttä]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [syö, syövä, syöhään, syöthään]
     syä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [syöhään, syöthään]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [syö]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [söin]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [söit]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [söi]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [söimä]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [söittä]
     syä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [söit, syöthiin]
     syä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [syöthiin]
     syä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [syö]
     syä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [syökö]
     syä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [syö]
     syä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [syökää]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [söisin]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [söisit]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [söis]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [söisimä]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [söisittä]
     syä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [söisit, söisivä]
     syä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [syövä]
     syä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [syövät]
     syä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [syötävä]
     syä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [syötävät]
     syä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [syöny]
     syä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [syöhneet, syönheet]
     syä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [syöty]
     syä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [syötyt]
     syä+V+AgPrc: [syömä]
     syä+V+Pass+Cond: [söis]
     syä+V+InfE+Ine: [syessä, syöessä]
     syä+V+InfE+Ins: [syöen]
     syä+V+InfMa+Ill: [syömhään, syöhmään]
     syä+V+InfMa+Ine: [syömässä]
     syä+V+InfMa+Ela: [syömästä]
     syä+V+InfMa+Ade: [syömälä]
     syä+V+InfMa+Abe: [syömättä]
     syä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [syöminen]


#Verb - käyä - v3_kaya: # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     käyä+V+Inf: [käyä]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [käyn]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [käyt]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [käy, käypi, käypii]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [käymä]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [käyttä]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [käy, käyhään, käyvä, käyhään]
     käyä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [käyhään, käythään]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [käy]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kävin]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kävit]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kävi]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kävimä]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kävittä]
     käyä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kävit, käythiin]
     käyä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [käythiin]
     käyä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [käy]
     käyä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [käykö]
     käyä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [käy]
     käyä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [käykää]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [kävisin]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [kävisit]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [kävis]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [kävisimmä]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [kävisittä]
     käyä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [kävisit, kävisivvä, kävisivä]
     käyä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [käyvä]
     käyä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [käyvät]
     käyä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [käytävä]
     käyä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [käytävät]
     käyä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [käyny]
     käyä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [käyhneet, käynheet]
     käyä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [käyty]
     käyä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [käytyt]
     käyä+V+AgPrc: [käymä]
     käyä+V+Pass+Cond: [käytäis, käytäs]
     käyä+V+InfE+Ine: [käyessä]
     käyä+V+InfE+Ins: [käyen]
     käyä+V+InfMa+Ill: [käyhmään, käymhään]
     käyä+V+InfMa+Ine: [käymässä]
     käyä+V+InfMa+Ela: [käymästä]
     käyä+V+InfMa+Ade: [käymälä]
     käyä+V+InfMa+Abe: [käymättä]
     käyä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [käyminen]

#Verb - nähhä - : # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     nähhä+V+Inf: [nähhä, nähjä, nähä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [näen]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [näet]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [näkkee]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [näemä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [näettä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [nähhään, näkevä, näkkee]
     nähhä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [nähhään]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [näe]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [näin]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [näit]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [näki]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [näimä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [näittä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [nähthiin, näit]
     nähhä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [nähthiin]
     nähhä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [näe]
     nähhä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [nähkö]
     nähhä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [näe]
     nähhä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [nähkää]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [näkisin]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [näkisit]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [näkis]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [näkisimmä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [näkisittä]
     nähhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [näkisit, näkisivvä, näkisivä]
     nähhä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [näkevä]
     nähhä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [näkevät]
     nähhä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [nähtävä]
     nähhä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [nähtävät]
     nähhä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [nähny]
     nähhä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [nähneet, nähnheet]
     nähhä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [nähty]
     nähhä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [nähtyt]
     nähhä+V+AgPrc: [näkemä]
     nähhä+V+Pass+Cond: [nähtäis]
     nähhä+V+InfE+Ine: [nähhessä]
     nähhä+V+InfE+Ins: [nähen, nähhen]
     nähhä+V+InfMa+Ill: [näkehmään, näkemhään]
     nähhä+V+InfMa+Ine: [näkemässä]
     nähhä+V+InfMa+Ela: [näkemästä]
     nähhä+V+InfMa+Ade: [näkemällä]
     nähhä+V+InfMa+Abe: [näkemättä]
     nähhä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [näkeminen]

#Verb - tehhä - : # meaning ''/'' - GOLD
     tehhä+V+Inf: [tehhä, tehjä, tehä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [tehen]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [tehet]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [tekkee]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tehemä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tehettä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tekevä, tekkee, tehhään, tehthään]
     tehhä+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: [tehhään, tehthään]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [tehe]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tehin]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tehit]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [teki]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tehimä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tehittä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tehit, tehthiin]
     tehhä+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: [tehthiin]
     tehhä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [tehe]
     tehhä+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: [tehkö]
     tehhä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: [tehe]
     tehhä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [tehkää]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [tekisin]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [tekisit]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [tekis]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [tekisimmä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [tekisittä]
     tehhä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [tekisit, tekisivvä, tekisivä]
     tehhä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tekevä]
     tehhä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tekevät]
     tehhä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tehtävä]
     tehhä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tehtävät]
     tehhä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [tehny]
     tehhä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tehneet,tehnheet]
     tehhä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [tehty]
     tehhä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tehtyt, tehyt]
     tehhä+V+AgPrc: [tekemä]
     tehhä+V+Pass+Cond: [tehtäs]
     tehhä+V+InfE+Ine: [tehessä]
     tehhä+V+InfE+Ins: [tehen]
     tehhä+V+InfMa+Ill: [tekehmään, tekemhään, tekheen]
     tehhä+V+InfMa+Ine: [tekemässä]
     tehhä+V+InfMa+Ela: [tekemästä]
     tehhä+V+InfMa+Ade: [tekemällä]
     tehhä+V+InfMa+Abe: [tekemättä]
     tehhä+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: [tekeminen]
     



     
